Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-1023
School district; general fund budget of expenditures; limitation; department; certification.

(1) On or before June 1, 2017, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.

(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and 81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or before September 20 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year, which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget authority is being calculated.

(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related to such student growth adjustment.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 14;

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 33;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 202;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 173;

Laws 1995, LB 613, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 27;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3814;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 669;

Laws 1998, LB 989, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 43;

Laws 2009, LB61, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB548, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB711, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 20;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB633, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB408, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB838, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB283, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB119, § 3.

Retirement expenditures, not exempt from limitations, see section 79-977.